Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 2

Certificate of Public Convenience and Necessity

65-4-201. Certificate required — Bond or other security required for projects proposed by public utilities providing wastewater service.

No public utility shall establish or begin the construction of, or operate any line, plant, or system, or route in or into a municipality or other territory already receiving a like service from another public utility, or establish service therein, without first having obtained from the commission, after written application and hearing, a certificate that the present or future public convenience and necessity require or will require such construction, establishment, and operation, and no person or corporation not at the time a public utility shall commence the construction of any plant, line, system, or route to be operated as a public utility, or the operation of which would constitute the same, or the owner or operator thereof, a public utility as defined by law, without having first obtained, in like manner, a similar certificate; provided, however, that this section shall not be construed to require any public utility to obtain a certificate for an extension in or about a municipality or territory where it shall theretofore have lawfully commenced operations, or for an extension into territory, whether within or without a municipality, contiguous to its route, plant, line, or system, and not theretofore receiving service of a like character from another public utility, or for substitute or additional facilities in or to territory already served by it.

Except as exempted by state or federal law, no individual or entity shall offer or provide any individual or group of telecommunications services, or extend its territorial areas of operations without first obtaining from the Tennessee public utility commission a certificate of convenience and necessity for such service or territory; provided, however, that no telecommunications services provider offering and providing a telecommunications service under the authority of the commission on June 6, 1995, is required to obtain additional authority in order to continue to offer and provide such telecommunications services as it offers and provides as of June 6, 1995.

After notice to the incumbent local exchange telephone company and other interested parties and following a hearing, the commission shall grant a certificate of convenience and necessity to a competing telecommunications service provider if after examining the evidence presented, the commission finds:

The applicant has demonstrated that it will adhere to all applicable commission policies, rules and orders; and

The applicant possesses sufficient managerial, financial and technical abilities to provide the applied for services.

A commission order, including appropriate findings of fact and conclusions of law, denying or approving, with or without modification, an application for certification of a competing telecommunications service provider shall be entered no more than sixty (60) days from the filing of the application.

Subsection (c) is not applicable to areas served by an incumbent local exchange telephone company with fewer than 100,000 total access lines in this state unless such company voluntarily enters into an interconnection agreement with a competing telecommunications service provider or unless such incumbent local exchange telephone company applies for a certificate to provide telecommunications services in an area outside its service area existing on June 6, 1995.

The commission shall direct the posting of a bond or other security by a public utility providing wastewater service or for a particular project proposed by a public utility providing wastewater service. The purpose of the bond or other security shall be to ensure the proper operation and maintenance of the public utility or project. The commission shall establish by rule the form of such bond or other security, the circumstances under which a bond or other security may be required, and the manner and circumstances under which the bond or other security may be forfeited.

The requirement under this subsection (e) to post a bond or other security by a public utility providing wastewater service shall also satisfy the requirement on such a public utility to provide a bond or other financial security to the department of environment and conservation as required by § 69-3-122.

The commission shall establish by rule the amount of such bond or other security for various sizes and types of facilities.

Notwithstanding any other law, posting a bond or other security under this subsection (e) or § 69-3-122, shall not be required until January 1, 2006, or until the commission's rules become effective, whichever occurs first. Such rules may be promulgated as emergency rules.

The commission shall not issue a certificate of public convenience and necessity for a wind energy facility that includes any wind turbine with a total height in excess of three hundred fifty feet (350') as measured from the ground at its base to the maximum height of the blade tip located on a mountain ridge at an elevation above two thousand five hundred feet (2,500') mean sea level or five hundred feet (500') or more above mean sea level of the adjacent valley floor. This subsection (f) shall not apply to single wind turbines less than one hundred feet (100') in height as measured from the ground at its base to the maximum height of the blade tip and used to generate electricity that is consumed on the same site where the wind turbine is located.

Acts 1923, ch. 87, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1843a1; Code 1932, § 5502; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-415; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 1995, ch. 408, § 7; 2005, ch. 62, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, § 12; 2017, ch. 94, § 51; 2018, ch. 825, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 12 provided that the Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted the occurences of “The commission” for “The authority” and “the commission” for “the authority” throughout; substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (b); and substituted “the commission's rules” for “the authority's rules” in (e)(3).

The 2018 amendment added (f).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 825, § 20. April 24, 2018.

Cross-References. Certificate required for interstate electric power facilities, § 65-4-208.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Social Performance of Public Utilities: Effects of Monopoly and Competition, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 308 (1942).

Attorney General Opinions. The federal communications commission has preempted T.C.A. § 65-4-201(d), but not T.C.A. § 65-4-201(c) pursuant to authority granted to it under the provisions of 47 U.S.C.S. § 253, enacted as part of the Telecommunications Act of 1996, OAG 01-036, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 36 (3/19/01).

65-4-202. Complaint of interference — Limited certificate.

If any public utility, in establishing, constructing, reconstructing, or extending its route, line, plant or system, shall interfere or be about to interfere with the existing route, line, plant, or system of any other public utility, the commission, on complaint of the public utility claiming to be injuriously affected, may, after hearing, make such order and prescribe such terms and conditions in harmony with this part as are just and reasonable. The commission shall have power, after a hearing involving the financial ability and good faith of the applicant, the necessity for additional service in the municipality or territory, and such other matters as it deems relevant, to issue a certificate of public necessity and convenience, or to refuse to issue the same or to issue it for the establishment or construction of a portion only of the contemplated plant, route, line, or system or extension thereof, or for the partial exercise only of such right or privilege, and may attach to the exercise of the rights granted by the certificate such terms and conditions as to time or otherwise as in its judgment the public convenience, necessity, and protection may require, and may forfeit such certificate after issuance, for noncompliance with its terms, or provide therein for an ipso facto forfeiture of the same for failure to exercise the rights granted within the time fixed by the commission; provided, that nothing in this part shall be construed as requiring such certificate for a municipally owned plant, project, or development.

Acts 1923, ch. 87, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1843a2; Code 1932, § 5503; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-416; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “The commission” for “The authority” and “the commission” for “the authority” throughout.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Collateral References.

Competition by grantor of nonexclusive franchise as violation of constitutional rights of franchise holder. 114 A.L.R. 192.

Right of public utility not having an exclusive franchise to protection against, or damages for, interference with its operations, property, or plant by a competitor. 119 A.L.R. 432.

65-4-203. Basis for granting certificate — Notice of hearing.

The commission shall not grant a certificate for a proposed route, plant, line, or system, or extension thereof, which will be in competition with any other route, plant, line, or system, unless it shall first determine that the facilities of the existing route, plant, line, or system are inadequate to meet the reasonable needs of the public, or the public utility operating the same refuses or neglects or is unable to or has refused or neglected, after reasonable opportunity after notice, to make such additions and extensions as may reasonably be required under this part.

In all proceedings under this section, the commission shall give at least ten (10) days' notice to the authorities of, and the public utilities operating in, the municipality or territory affected.

This section shall not apply to telecommunications service providers.

Acts 1923, ch. 87, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1843a3; Code 1932, § 5504; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-417; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 1995, ch. 408, § 5; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. This section is suspended by necessary implication by § 65-15-107 insofar as it relates to issuance of certificates to motor carriers. See Tennessee-Carolina Transp., Inc. v. Pentecost, 211 Tenn. 72, 362 S.W.2d 461 (1962).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “The commission” for “The authority” at the beginning of (a); and substituted “the commission” for “the authority” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 58.

Law Reviews.

Report on Administrative Law to the Tennessee Law Revision Commission, 20 Vand. L. Rev. 777 (1967).

Attorney General Opinions. Authority as to certification of competing local telecommunications providers, OAG 94-144, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 170(12/16/94).

65-4-204. Public hearing on certificate — Plans and information required of applicant.

The commission may, upon its own initiative, or shall upon written application of any party in interest, order a public hearing with due notice to all interested parties, at which hearing the person proposing to create the development of water power or other plant or equipment, or extension of the same, shall be required to file with the commission, under oath, engineering plans and other information fully descriptive of the proposed development or such thereof as in the opinion of the commission can reasonably be furnished by such applicant, together with such other reasonable information as may be called for at the hearing or any adjournment of the same; and the commission shall have full power to issue or refuse the certificate of public necessity and convenience, or to qualify or withdraw the same as provided in § 65-4-203.

Acts 1923, ch. 87, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1843a4; Code 1932, § 5505; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-418; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “The commission” for “The authority” at the beginning; and substituted “the commission” for “the authority” throughout.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-4-205. Evidence.

All evidence taken by the commission in any such hearing or hearings shall be taken under oath and may be treated as evidence in any court.

Acts 1923, ch. 87, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 1843a6; Code 1932, § 5507; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-419; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-4-206. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-4-206 (Acts 1923, ch. 87, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 1843a5; Code 1932, § 5506; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-420), concerning the fee for issuing the certificate, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 862, § 2.

65-4-207. Law inapplicable at local option.

This part does not apply where any municipality or county by resolution or ordinance declares that a public necessity requires a competing company in that municipality or county.

This section shall not apply to telecommunications service providers; provided, that this section shall continue to apply with respect to any ordinance adopted, and any franchise granted pursuant to such an ordinance, prior to June 6, 1995.

Acts 1923, ch. 87, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 1843a8; Code 1932, § 5508; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-421; Acts 1995, ch. 408, § 6.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Social Performance of Public Utilities: Effects of Monopoly and Competition, 17 Tenn. L. Rev. 308 (1942).

65-4-208. Interstate transmission of electric power.

Notwithstanding any other law, no person, firm or corporation not engaged on March 22, 1955, in the business of generating, transmitting, distributing, or furnishing electric power shall extend or construct transmission or distribution lines or other works into or within the state, directly or indirectly enter the state, for the purpose of delivering within the state electric power generated at a point or points outside the state, unless such person, firm or corporation shall have first submitted its plans for such extension, construction or entry to the commission and shall have obtained from the commission a certificate of public convenience and necessity covering the same. The commission shall deny such certificate if, after a hearing, the commission cannot affirmatively establish that the granting of such certificate would serve the public interest.

This section shall not apply to the federal government or any federal agency, to the state of Tennessee or any agency or political subdivision of the state, or to any cooperative association organized under the former Electric Cooperative Act or the former Electric Membership Corporation Act, but shall be fully applicable to any private corporation organized under the laws of this or any other state and to any public corporation of any other state, irrespective of the nature, identity or governmental or other public status of the purchaser, consumer, or other party to whom electric power is to be delivered within the state.

The provisions of this section shall be cumulative and the requirements contained in this section shall be in addition to, and not in substitution for, the requirements contained in any other law.

Acts 1955, ch. 325, §§ 1-3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-438 — 65-440; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 20; 2017, ch. 94, § 51.

Compiler's Notes. The Electric Cooperative Act, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 2. For the Rural Electric and Community Services Cooperative Act, see title 65, ch. 25, part 2.

The Electric Membership Corporation Act, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 689, § 5.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” and “The commission” for “The authority” throughout (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Cross-References. Rural electric and community services cooperatives, title 65, ch. 25, part 2.